Washington statutes.
RCW 41.59.010

Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to prescribe certain rights and obligations of the educational employees of the school districts of the state of Washington, and to establish procedures governing the relationship between such employees and their employers which are designed to meet the special requirements and needs of public employment in education.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 2.]